Maryland, session 2026, HB0503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–316.
(a) This section applies only in Baltimore City.
(i) (1) This subsection applies only to all full–time sworn law enforcement
officers who are deputy sheriffs at the rank of lieutenant or below and court security
officers.
(2) This subsection does not apply to the following employees in the
Sheriff’s Office:
– 1 –

Ch. 568 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Sworn law enforcement officers in the Sheriff’s Office at a rank
of captain or above;
(ii) Employees in appointed positions;
(iii) Civilian merit system employees;
(iv) Full–time reduced hours employees;
(v) Part–time employees;
(vi) Contractual employees;
(vii) Temporary employees;
(viii) Emergency employees; or
(ix) Employees whose employment is administered under the
Baltimore City policies and procedures manual.
(3) (i) A deputy sheriff or a court security officer has the right to:
1. Take part in or refrain from taking part in forming,
joining, supporting, or participating in any employee organization or its lawful activities;
2. Be represented by an exclusive representative, if any, in
collective bargaining; and
3. Engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of
collective bargaining.
(ii) Full–time sworn law enforcement officers and court security
officers may seek recognition by the Sheriff or the Sheriff’s designee in order to organize
and bargain collectively in good faith WITH THE SHERIFF, OR THE SHERIFF’S
DESIGNEE, AND THE CITY concerning the following matters:
1. Compensation, [excluding] INCLUDING salary, wages,
MERIT STEP INCREASES, and those benefits determined, offered, administered,
controlled, or managed by the City;
2. Leave, holidays, and vacations; and
3. Hours, working conditions, and job security.
(iii) [Sworn law enforcement officers and court security officers may
seek recognition in order to organize and bargain collectively in good faith with the City
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 568
concerning merit step increases and those benefits determined, offered, administered,
controlled, or managed by the City.
(iv)] 1. A sworn law enforcement officer or a court security officer
who is a member of a bargaining unit with an exclusive representative may discuss any
matter with the employer without the intervention of the exclusive representative.
2. If a discussion under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph leads to a resolution or an adjustment of a dispute, the resolution or
adjustment may not be inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement
then in effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –